Massachusetts, session 194th, H609.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3A of chapter 70B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking the number "17" and inserting in its place the number
"19" and by adding after the words: "Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc."
the following: "Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc., Alliance for
Vocational Technical Education Coalition."
of 1